Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 23 Coastal Resources Management Council
46-23-15.1.
Coordination of harbor safety and enforcement patrols.

Coastal municipalities which share a common boundary along their public waters may enter into a binding memorandum of agreement allowing for harbormasters and other officials charged with enforcement of harbor management plan harbor ordinances from one coastal municipality to enforce the harbor ordinances of the bordering coastal municipality upon the public waters of the bordering coastal municipality when the coastal municipalities have harbor management plans approved by the coastal resources management council and the memorandum of agreement is approved by the respective town or city councils. This binding memorandum of agreement shall specify how each coastal municipality is to receive any fines collected under this reciprocal enforcement agreement and the jurisdiction in which any disputes arising out of this reciprocal enforcement agreement shall be litigated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 1.

46-23-16.
Length of permits, licenses, and easements.

The council is authorized to grant permits, licenses, and easements for any term of years or in perpetuity. Permits, licenses, or easements which are issued by the council for the filling of the submerged or submersible lands of the state of Rhode Island remain subject to the public trust, and no title is conveyed by such documents. All such permits, licenses, and easements shall clearly state that no title is being conveyed. Permits, licenses or easements issued by the council are valid only with the conditions and stipulation under which they are granted and imply no guarantee of renewal. The initial application or an application for renewal may be subject to denial or modification. If an application is granted, said permit, license and easement may be subject to revocation and/or modification for failure to comply with the conditions and stipulations under which the same was issued or for other good cause. The division of coastal resources of the department of environmental management shall transfer all of the records and files of the former division of harbours and rivers to the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1976, ch. 329, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 42, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 358, § 1.

46-23-17.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 270, § 5; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 191, § 4, effective July 15, 2019; P.L. 2019, ch. 244, § 4, effective July 15, 2019.

46-23-18.
Prohibited activities.

No person, either as principal, agent or servant nor any firm, corporation, or any other entity shall, without a permit issued by the coastal resources management council, construct a marina within two thousand feet (2000´) of a shellfish management area as defined by rules and regulations of the department of environmental management. Such permit shall include any permit required under subsection (b).

No person, either as principal, agent, or servant, or any firm, corporation or any other entity, shall, within the tidal waters of the state, conduct or cause to conduct dredging, transportation and/or disposal of dredge materials without a permit issued by the coastal resources management council, a water quality certification issued by the department of environmental management pursuant to chapter 12 of this title and any permit required by the army corps of engineers. In addition, no person, either as principal, agent, or servant, nor any firm, corporation or any other entity, shall dispose of dredge materials other than in tidal waters without any permit, approval or certification that may otherwise be required.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 271, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 281, § 2.

46-23-18.1.
Permitting.

Any person, either as principal, agent, or servant, or any firm, corporation or any other entity desiring to conduct any activity or activities specified in §

46-23-18

shall file an application for a permit with the coastal resources management council upon forms furnished by coastal resources management council.

A hearing shall be held on the application within thirty (30) days of filing.

The applicant shall bear the burden of proving that the activity or activities specified in the application will cause no significant adverse impact upon the environment or natural resources of the state, and the coastal resources management council shall be empowered to deny the application if the applicant does not demonstrate, in addition to other requirements of this chapter, that the activity or activities will not:

Significantly adversely affect any shellfish management area as designated by the department of environmental management or the marine fisheries council;

Be in a significant conflict with the marine ecology within or adjacent to the state’s territorial waters; or

Significantly harm or destroy existing fishing grounds.

With respect to an application seeking a permit from the coastal resources management council to conduct or cause to conduct dredging, transportation and/or disposal of dredge material, the applicant shall also satisfy the council that the proposal in the application is consistent with a comprehensive program developed pursuant to §

46-23-6(1)(ii)(H)

.

In determining whether an applicant has met the burden of proof under subsection (c), the coastal resources management council shall apply standards that conform with the federal Environmental Protection Agency’s applicable standards and guidelines for the management of dredge materials, including, but not limited to, the federal Environmental Protection Agency’s rules, regulations and guidelines for deviating from said standards.

The applicant shall, at least three (3) days before commencing any dredging, give written notice to the coastal resources management council of the intent to commence the activities specified in the permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 271, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 281, § 3.

46-23-18.2.
Rules and regulations.

The council, upon recommendation by the coastal resources advisory committee, shall issue reasonable rules and regulations governing the dredging, transporting and disposal of all dredge materials in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 271, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 281, § 3.

46-23-18.3.
Sites for disposal of spoil from dredge operations, selection.

The council, upon recommendation of the coastal resources advisory committee, on or before the first day of January, 1999 and periodically thereafter as necessary, shall consistent with the comprehensive programs required in §

46-23-6(1)(ii)(H)

identify and establish one or more in-water disposal sites to be used for the purpose of disposal of dredge materials from marinas and yacht clubs.

The council, upon recommendation of the coastal resources advisory committee, on or before the first day of January, 2002 and periodically thereafter as necessary, shall consistent with the comprehensive programs required in §

46-23-6(1)(ii)(H)

identify and establish one or more in-water disposal sites to be used for the purpose of disposal of dredge materials from all sources not otherwise delineated in (a) above.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 271, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 281, § 3; P.L. 1998, ch. 359, § 1.

46-23-18.4.
Enforcement.

The provisions of §§

46-23-18

through

46-23-18.3

shall be enforced by the coastal resources management council. Nothing herein shall be deemed to abrogate the department of environmental management’s authority to enforce its water quality standards adopted pursuant to §

46-12-3(7)

or (24).

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 271, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 281, § 3.

46-23-18.5.
Fees for disposal.

The council is authorized to impose a fee of not less than eleven dollars and sixty-five cents ($11.65) per cubic yard for the disposal of dredge materials at the sites established by the council pursuant to §

46-23-18.3

, with eleven dollars and sixty-five cents ($11.65) being deposited into the general fund. The amount of the fee established by the council pursuant to the section shall be reviewed by the council on an annual basis and revised as the council deems necessary, but in no event shall the fee be set at an amount less than eleven dollars and sixty-five cents ($11.65) per cubic yard of material.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 36, § 1.

46-23-18.6.
Coastal Resources Management Council Dredge Fund.

There is hereby created a separate fund to be held by the coastal resources management council to be known as the dredge fund. Any amount charged above the eleven dollars and sixty-five cents ($11.65) must be deposited into the fund and shall not be deposited into the general fund of the state, but shall be kept by the general treasurer of the state in a separate fund for the coastal resources management council, and shall be paid out by the treasurer upon the order of the council, without the necessity of appropriation or re-appropriation by the general assembly. Funds must be used to create additional dredging and disposal options.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 36, § 1.

46-23-19.
Repealed.

46-23-20.
Administrative hearings.

All contested cases, all contested enforcement proceedings, and all contested administrative fines shall be heard by the administrative hearing officers, or by subcommittees as provided in §

46-23-20.1

, pursuant to the regulations promulgated by the council; provided, however, that no proceeding and hearing prior to the appointment of the hearing officers shall be subject to the provisions of this section. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the commissioner of coastal resources management shall be authorized, in his or her discretion, to resolve contested licensing and enforcement proceedings through informal disposition pursuant to regulations promulgated by the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 212, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 10.

46-23-20.1.
Hearing officers — Appointment — Compensation — Subcommittee.

The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint two (2) hearing officers who shall be attorneys-at-law, who, prior to their appointment, shall have practiced law for a period of not less than five (5) years for a term of five (5) years; provided, however, that the initial appointments shall be as follows: one hearing officer shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years and one hearing officer shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years. The appointees shall be addressed as hearing officers.

The governor shall designate one of the hearing officers as chief hearing officer. The hearing officers shall hear proceedings as provided by this section, and the council, with the assistance of the chief hearing officer, may promulgate such rules and regulations as shall be necessary or desirable to effect the purposes of this section.

A hearing officer shall be devoted full time to these administrative duties, and shall not otherwise practice law while holding office nor be a partner nor an associate of any person in the practice of law.

Compensation for hearing officers shall be determined by the unclassified pay board.

Whenever the chairperson of the coastal resources management council or, in the absence of the chairperson, the commissioner of coastal resources makes a finding that the hearing officers are otherwise engaged and unable to hear a matter in a timely fashion, he or she may appoint a subcommittee which will act as hearing officers in any contested case coming before the council. The subcommittee shall consist of at least one member; provided, however, that in all contested cases an additional member shall be a resident of the coastal community affected. The city or town council of each coastal community shall, at the beginning of its term of office, appoint a resident of that city or town to serve as an alternate member of the aforesaid subcommittee should there be no existing member of the coastal resources management council from that city or town available to serve on the subcommittee. Any member of the subcommittee actively engaged in hearing a case shall continue to hear the case, even though his or her term may have expired, until the case is concluded and a vote taken thereon. Hearings before subcommittees shall be subject to all rules of practice and procedure as govern hearings before hearing officers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 11.

46-23-20.2.
Clerk.

The commissioner of coastal resources or his or her designee shall serve as clerk to the hearing officers. The clerk shall have general charge of the office, keep a full record of proceedings, file and preserve all documents and papers, prepare such papers and notices as may be required, and perform such other duties as required. The commissioner shall have the power to issue subpoenas for witnesses and documents and to administer oaths in all cases before any hearing officer or pertaining to the duties of his or her office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 11.

46-23-20.3.
Prehearing procedure.

Prior to the commencement of any hearing, the hearing officer may in his or her discretion direct the parties or their attorneys to appear before him or her for such conferences as shall be necessary. At the conferences, the hearing officer may order any party to file, prior to the commencement of any formal hearing, exhibits that the party intends to use in the hearing, and the names and addresses of witnesses that the party intends to produce in its direct case, together with a short statement of the testimony of each witness. Following entry of an order, a party shall not be permitted, except in the discretion of the hearing officer, to introduce into evidence, in the party’s direct case, exhibits which are not filed in accordance with the order. At the conference, the hearing officer may designate a date before which he or she requires any party to specify what issues are conceded, and further proof of conceded issues shall not be required. The hearing officer shall also require the parties to simplify the issues, to consider admissions of fact and of documents which will avoid unnecessary proof, and to limit the number of expert witnesses. The hearing officer shall enter an order reciting the concessions and agreements made by the parties, and shall enter an order on such other matters as are pertinent to the conduct of the hearing, and unless modified, the hearing shall be conducted by the order.

The hearing officer may also order the parties to file, prior to the commencement of any hearing, the testimony of any or all of their respective witnesses, and to submit the testimony to the hearing officer and the opposing party or the opposing counsel by such date as the hearing officer shall determine. The witness shall testify under oath, and all of the testimony shall be in a question and answer format. Save for good cause shown, said testimony shall be the direct examination of the witness; provided, however, that the witness shall be available at the hearing for cross-examination by the opposing party or opposing counsel.

The council, with the assistance of the chief hearing officer, shall promulgate, by regulation, such other prehearing procedures and/or hearing procedures as deemed necessary, including the use of portions of the superior court civil rules of discovery where such are not inconsistent with the applicable provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 11.

46-23-20.4.
Hearings — Orders.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, every hearing for the adjudication of a violation or for a contested matter shall be held before a hearing officer or a subcommittee. The chief hearing officer shall assign a hearing officer to each matter not assigned to a subcommittee. After due consideration of the evidence and arguments, the hearing officer shall make written proposed findings of fact and proposed conclusions of law which shall be made public when submitted to the council for review. The council may, in its discretion, adopt, modify, or reject the findings of fact and/or conclusions of law; provided, however, that any modification or rejection of the proposed findings of fact or conclusions of law shall be in writing and shall state the rationales therefor.

The director of the department of environmental management and the coastal resources management council shall promulgate such rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, as to assure uniformity of proceedings as applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 11.

46-23-20.5.
Ex parte consultations.

Council members shall have no communication directly or indirectly, with a hearing officer relating to any issue of fact or of law on any matter then pending before the hearing officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 11.

46-23-20.6.
Oaths — Subpoenas — Powers of hearing officers.

The hearing officers are hereby severally authorized and empowered to administer oaths, and the hearing officers, in all cases of every nature pending before them, are hereby authorized and empowered to summon and examine witnesses and to compel the production and examination of papers, books, accounts, documents, records, certificates and other legal evidence that may be necessary or proper for the determination and decision of any question before or the discharge of any duty required by law of the hearing officer. All subpoenas and subpoena duces tecum shall be signed by a hearing officer or the commissioner of coastal resources, and shall be served as subpoenas are served in civil cases in the superior court; and witnesses so subpoenaed shall be entitled to the same fees for attendance and travel as are provided for witnesses in civil cases in the superior court. In cases of contumacy or refusal to obey the command of the subpoena so issued, the superior court shall have jurisdiction upon application of the council with proof by affidavit of the fact, to issue a rule or order returnable, in not less than two (2) nor more than five (5) days, directing the person to show cause why he or she should not be adjudged in contempt. Upon return of such order, the justice, before whom the matter is brought for hearing, shall examine under oath the person, and the person shall be given an opportunity to be heard, and if the justice shall determine that the person has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined or to answer legal or pertinent questions, he or she may impose a fine upon the offender or forthwith commit the offender to the adult correctional institutions, there to remain until he or she submits to do the act which he or she was so required to do, or is discharged according to law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 11.

46-23-21.
Notice of permit — Recordation.

A notice of permit shall be eligible for recordation under chapter 13 of title 34 as determined by the executive director, and shall be recorded at the expense of the applicant in the land evidence records of the city or town where the property subject to permit is located, and any subsequent transferee of the property shall be responsible for complying with the terms and conditions of the permit. The clerk of the various cities and towns shall record any orders, findings, or decisions of the council at no expense to the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 423, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 10.

46-23-22.
Solid waste disposal licenses — Hearings.

The chairperson of the coastal resources management council and the commissioner of the environmental protection branch of the department of environmental management shall coordinate concurrent hearings on solid waste disposal license applications; provided, however, that the chairperson and the commissioner of the environmental protection branch of the department of environmental management may designate a hearing officer or subcommittee to hear all matters pertaining to the application and; provided further, that the hearing officer may be from the department of environmental management, the coastal resources management council hearing officer, a subcommittee, or an ad hoc hearing officer. The commissioner of coastal resources management with the approval of the chairperson may waive jurisdiction in those instances where the commissioner finds that there is no substantive coastal resources issue or that another agency or branch has adjudicated or addressed the issue.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 508, § 8; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 10.

46-23-23.
Municipal comprehension plan consideration.

The coastal resources management council shall conform to the requirements of the Comprehensive Planning and Land Use Regulation Act, § 45-22.2.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 114, § 6.

46-23-24.
Lien on property.

The executive director may record the notice of fee or final order of fine as a lien on the subject property in the land evidence records of the town or city in which said property is located. Recordation of said fee or final order of fine shall be the only manner by which said lien may be perfected against the subject property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 355, § 1.

46-23-25.
Issuance of beach vehicle registration permits.

The coastal resources management council may issue beach vehicle registration permits in accordance with §

31-8-1.1

of the general laws and adopt regulations that the council deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The council may appoint responsible citizens or corporations of the state, engaged in operating sporting goods stores to act as agents with authority to issue permits in the manner and under the conditions as set forth below. Before an appointment shall occur, that citizen or corporation of the state shall deliver to the council a bond with a surety company authorized to do business in the state of Rhode Island. The requirements and conditions of the bond shall be established by the regulations.

Any person or corporation appointed by the council as provided in section (a) above shall, upon the application of any person entitled to receive a permit under this chapter and upon payment of the specified permit fee, register and issue to the person a beach vehicle registration permit in the form prescribed and furnished by the council. The permit shall bear the name, place of residence, and signature of the registrant, and the vehicle make, model, year, and license plate number and shall authorize the registrant to own and operate a beach vehicle in the state of Rhode Island during those seasons and in those manners and according to those conditions as shall be provided by regulations established by the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 322, § 1.